Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
Reclamation
350.465.
Permanent regulatory program.

The provisions of this section and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, except with regard to the mining of clay, limestone, sand, gravel, fluorspar, stone, and rock asphalt, shall apply to the regulation of all surface coal mining and reclamation operations in the Commonwealth in the event that the Commonwealth receives from the United States Department of Interior and pursuant to the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977, PL 95-87, approval of a permanent state regulatory program, and the Commonwealth has promulgated regulations pursuant to this section.

The Energy and Environment Cabinet is hereby authorized and directed to prepare, develop and promulgate a comprehensive permanent regulatory program for the implementation of the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977, PL 95-87, for the purpose of accepting and administering primary enforcement responsibilities pursuant to that act. The implementation of this section shall contain procedures similar to the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977, PL 95-87, and shall require surface coal mining operation performance standards no more stringent than provided for in that act. Nothing in this section shall be construed to empower the cabinet to adopt a regulatory program in conflict with the policy and purposes of the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977, PL 95-87. To that end, the Energy and Environment Cabinet shall include in its permanent regulatory program:

Environmental protection performance standards to prevent or minimize the adverse environmental effects of surface coal mining and reclamation operations on the land and water resources of the Commonwealth;

A procedure for designating as being unsuitable for mining certain lands because of their topographical, geological, hydrological, climatological, biological, or chemical characteristics or historical, cultural, scientific, or aesthetic values;

Procedures and regulations for the allowance of those persons having an interest which is or may be adversely affected to have the opportunity to be heard at every significant or critical part of the administrative and judicial process, including, but not limited to, the permit review and issuance process, the general enforcement process and hearings incident thereto, and the rulemaking procedures conducted by the cabinet; and procedures and regulations for persons having a valid legal interest which is or may be adversely affected by the setting, release, and inspection of bonds to have an opportunity to be heard at every significant or critical part of the administrative and judicial process relating to bonds. The regulations shall provide reasonable procedures for notice and an opportunity to be heard, access to minesites, access to records, and other reasonable procedures to accomplish the purposes of this chapter;

Procedures for the administrative and judicial review of all actions of the cabinet to administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter, including the award of costs and expenses, including attorney’s fees and expert witness fees, by the cabinet or the court;

Plans and procedures for the reclamation and restoration of land and water resources affected by mining which have been abandoned or inadequately reclaimed to the standards imposed by this section and for which no bond is held or legal obligation to reclaim continues. The plan shall include provisions for the imposition of liens for necessary reclamation expenditures made on private property; and

Procedures for the assumption of the small operator assistance program pursuant to the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977, PL 95-87. The cabinet shall assume and implement that program and apply for and administer funds as may be provided pursuant to that act and such state funds as may be provided for the program.

In addition to any other authority, power, and duty vested in it by law, the cabinet shall have and exercise broad authority, power, and duty to:

Require those persons who wish to engage in surface coal mining and reclamation operations to submit application for a permit from the cabinet to conduct the operations, and to include in that application all information required by the cabinet pertaining to that operation;

Issue, deny, or modify under such conditions as the cabinet may prescribe, permits to conduct surface coal mining and reclamation operations within the Commonwealth;

Enter and inspect any permitted surface coal mining and reclamation operation or any known or suspected unpermitted mining operation for the purpose of ascertaining compliance with any provision of this chapter or of the permit;

Order the cessation of mining activities, and if necessary impose affirmative abatement obligations, upon the permittee, operator, or person when, upon inspection, the cabinet determines that this section or any permit condition is being or has been violated so as to constitute an imminent and inordinate peril to the welfare of the Commonwealth;

Order a person, permittee, or an operator to comply with the requirements of this section or his permit if inspection reveals a violation of the conditions of his permit or of any provision of this section;

Order a permittee to appear and show cause why his permit should not be suspended or revoked and his bond forfeited if the cabinet determines that the permittee or operator or the permitted operation has a pattern of violations of this section or permit conditions, and has willfully violated this section or permit conditions or a pattern of violations exists and that the violations are caused by the operator’s or permittee’s unwarranted failure to comply with this section or permit conditions;

Require, increase, release, or decrease, under such conditions as the cabinet may prescribe, reclamation performance bonds and cause the forfeiture and collection of those bonds where the permittee has abandoned the operation or for which the permit under which the bond was given has been revoked or has expired without the required reclamation;

To administratively impose, in lieu of those civil penalties provided for in KRS

350.990

, civil penalties of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per day for violations of permit conditions, this section, or any orders of the cabinet and enforce the administrative assessment of the penalties by initiating civil action in the Franklin Circuit Court or in any court having jurisdiction of the defendant;

Conduct hearings and make investigations of any matter relating to the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations, and provide for the assessment and payment of civil penalties including the placement of proposed civil penalty assessments into an escrow account prior to a contest on the amount of the assessment, consistent with the process of law;

Provide for variances or exceptions consistent with KRS

350.450

from or in addition to mining performance standards, recognizing the specific characteristics inherent in:

Steep slope mining;

Mountaintop removal;

Relatively low acreage disturbance or annual coal production;

Prime farmland mining as defined by the United States Department of Agriculture, and to provide for other variances where land uses and watersheds will be improved; and

Postmining uses different from and as beneficial as the premining uses;

Receive and expend funds or aid from whatever source to accomplish the purposes of this chapter; and

Propose and promulgate regulations to accomplish the purposes of this section.

The cabinet shall not promulgate regulations which are inconsistent with the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977, PL 95-87.

Any person who violates a provision of this section or the regulations promulgated pursuant thereto shall be subject to those penalties and remedies set forth in KRS

350.990

except as provided for in subsection (3)(h) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 330, § 28, effective June 1, 1979; 1980, ch. 62, § 34; 1992, ch. 429, § 34, effective July 14, 1992; 2010, ch. 24, § 1889, effective July 15, 2010.

350.470.
Review of regulations. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 330, § 29, effective June 1, 1979; 1980, ch. 377, § 6; repealed by 2017 ch. 117, § 49, effective June 29, 2017.

Compiler's Notes.

This section (Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 330, § 29, effective June 1, 1979; 1980, ch. 377, § 6) was repealed by Acts
2017, ch. 117, § 49, effective June 29, 2017.

350.475.
Regulations regarding disturbance of reclaimed permit areas and for transferring liability for reclamation.

The Energy and Environment Cabinet is directed to promulgate regulations which specifically address what liability surface mining permittees shall have to reclaim permit areas on which parties or forces not controlled by the permittee have disturbed the reclamation previously performed by the permittee. Such parties or forces not controlled by the permittee shall include, without limitation, acts of God, oil and gas operations, loggers, recreational vehicles, and trespassers.

The Energy and Environment Cabinet is also directed to promulgate regulations which specifically set forth the procedure for transferring liability for reclamation of a surface mining permit to a party who will make a post mining use of the permit area.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 494, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2010, ch. 24, § 1890, effective July 15, 2010.

350.480.
Use of simplified procedures for determining restoration of soil productivity on mined prime farmlands.

The cabinet shall allow the use of a soil test or other simplified procedures to determine if soil productivity on mined prime farmlands has been restored to levels that would allow average crop yields to equal or exceed the average yield of the reference crop, provided the methods are approved by the Office of Surface Mining.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 284, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

350.485.
Promotion of research and data collection on simplified procedures to determine their validity with respect to restoration of soil productivity on mined prime farmlands.

The cabinet shall encourage research and data collection to determine the validity of using a soil test or other simplified procedure to determine if mined prime farmland soils will meet yield requirements.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 284, § 2, effective July 14, 1992.

350.500.
Definitions for KRS 350.500 to 350.521.

As used in KRS

350.500

to

350.521

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Actuarial soundness” means the fund has achieved financial positioning such that the collected revenues, including bond forfeiture amounts, and earned investment income in aggregate are sufficient to build reserves that can be reasonably anticipated to provide for the long-term future expected reclamation losses, including shock or catastrophic losses, loss adjustment expenses, and administrative expenses associated with the fund’s operation;

“Date of establishment of the fund” means July 1, 2013;

“Kentucky reclamation guaranty fund” or “the fund” means the fund established in KRS

350.503

;

“Reclamation Guaranty Fund Commission” or “commission” means the commission established in KRS

350.506

; and

“Voluntary bond pool fund” means that bond pool fund established in KRS

350.700

to

350.755

, which are repealed by 2013 Ky. Acts ch. 78, sec. 12.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 78, § 1, effective March 22, 2013.

350.503.
Kentucky reclamation guaranty fund.

There is hereby established a revolving fund to be known as the “Kentucky reclamation guaranty fund,” which shall be administratively assigned to the cabinet and which shall be administered in accordance with the terms of KRS

350.500

to

350.521

.

The fund shall consist of all moneys collected pursuant to KRS

350.515

and

350.518

.

Moneys collected pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall not be utilized for the reclamation of permits forfeited prior to January 1, 2014, except for obligations as may arise from the forfeiture of bonds prior to that date secured by the voluntary bond pool.

Moneys in the fund shall be held in an interest-bearing account and shall be used as follows and for no other purposes:

To reclaim, in the event of forfeiture, permit areas or increments thereof, covered by the fund;

To compensate the cabinet for costs of administering the fund;

To fund audits and actuarial studies required under KRS

350.509

; and

To cover all operating expenses and any necessary legal expenses of the Reclamation Guaranty Fund Commission.

Moneys in the fund shall not be utilized for long-term treatment of substandard water discharges and subsidence.

Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, any moneys remaining in the fund at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse, but shall be carried forward into the succeeding fiscal year for use as provided in this section.

The fund shall be exempt from the requirements applicable to insurers under KRS Chapter 304.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 78, § 2, effective March 22, 2013.

350.506.
Reclamation Guaranty Fund Commission — Membership — Bylaws — Meetings — Conflicts of interest — Applicability of Executive Branch Code of Ethics.

There is hereby created the Reclamation Guaranty Fund Commission which shall be administratively attached to the cabinet. The commission shall consist of seven (7) members. One (1) member shall be the secretary of the Energy and Environment Cabinet, or his or her designee, who shall serve as chair of the commission. The other six (6) members of the commission shall be appointed by the Governor as follows:

Three (3) members of the commission shall be representatives of coal mining permittees that participate in the fund, with the following qualifications tiered to represent the size of the operator measured in tons of coal sold:

A representative of a permittee which participates in the fund and has mined and sold less than one million (1,000,000) tons of coal during the twelve (12) months preceding appointment;

A representative of a permittee which participates in the fund and has mined and sold over one million (1,000,000) tons but less than five million (5,000,000) tons of coal during the twelve (12) months preceding appointment; and

A representative of a permittee which participates in the fund and has mined and sold more than five million (5,000,000) tons of coal during the twelve (12) months preceding appointment.

If no permittee that participates in the fund meets the qualifications stated in subparagraph 2. or 3. of this paragraph, then a qualified permittee shall be selected in a lower tier;

Two (2) members of the commission shall be representatives with a background in the insurance and banking industries with knowledge of the coal industry and chosen from a list of nominees submitted by the chair of the commission and the remaining members of the commission; and

One (1) member shall be a certified public accountant who is not associated with, or does not have a financial interest in, coal mining operations in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

Appointments shall be made by the Governor for terms of four (4) years. Members may serve successive terms if reappointed, not to exceed two (2) full consecutive terms. Any vacancy in an unexpired term shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the term by the Governor.

A member of the commission shall be elected at the first meeting of each fiscal year by majority vote of the other members to serve as vice chair of the commission whose term shall be for one (1) year.

The commission shall adopt bylaws by which it shall establish procedures for conduct of meetings.

The official domicile of the commission shall be Franklin County. All actions of the commission shall be considered to occur in Franklin County.

The commission shall meet no less than once every three (3) months. Four (4) members of the commission shall constitute a quorum at any meeting.

Each commission member, except the cabinet representative, shall receive one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per diem for each meeting attended. Members of the commission also shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses directly related to meetings of the commission.

If a member of the commission fails to attend four (4) consecutive meetings, the position shall be considered to be vacated, and the Governor, after receiving notice of the vacancy from the commission, shall immediately appoint a qualified person to serve the remainder of the term.

Any member of the commission having any direct or indirect financial interest or any other conflict of interest with respect to an assignment of classification pursuant to KRS

350.518

, sanctions for nonpayment of fees established in KRS

350.515

and

350.518

, or assessment of the fee pursuant to KRS 350.518, shall not participate in any discussion or vote pertaining to specific mining operations for which the member is an owner or employee.

Misuse of the office by a member of the commission to obtain personal, pecuniary, or material gain or advantage for himself or a company in his dominion or control shall be automatic grounds for removal by the Governor.

Members of the commission, its agents, and employees shall be immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, which is based upon any official act or acts performed by them in good faith.

Members of the commission, its agents, and employees shall be subject to the terms and provisions of the Executive Branch Code of Ethics, as set forth in KRS Chapter 11A.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 78, § 3, effective March 22, 2013; 2022 ch. 166, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(3/22/2013). Under the authority of KRS 7.136(1), the Reviser of Statutes has modified the internal numbering of subsection (1)(a) of this statute from the way it appeared in 2013 Ky. Acts ch. 78, sec. 3. The words in the text were not changed.

350.509.
Duties of commission.

The commission shall be attached to the cabinet for administrative purposes and staffed by the Office of the Reclamation Guaranty Fund established pursuant to KRS

350.512

. The commission shall:

Review, recommend, and promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, which are necessary to:

Monitor and maintain the fund;

Establish a structure for the administration of processing claims and making payments;

Establish mechanisms for review of the viability of the fund and criteria for determining when a recommendation shall be made to the secretary of the cabinet to close the fund for failure to maintain actuarial soundness;

Set the schedule of penalties consistent with this chapter associated with late payment, failure to pay, and defrauding the commission through the submission of fraudulent information or withholding requested documentation;

Review, in accordance with the applicable administrative regulations of the cabinet and KRS

350.515

and

350.518

, all assignments of permittee classification of mine type and assessment of established fees; and

Establish a structure for the payment of the assessments required in KRS

350.515

(2)(b) and

350.518

;

Notify permittees of suspension or reinstatement of the fees required by KRS 350.518(2);

Employ, in accordance with KRS

45A.690

to

45A.725

, a certified public accountant in good standing to perform an annual audit of the fund for the first five (5) years of the operations of the fund. Thereafter, the commission shall have audits performed every two (2) years or more frequently as determined necessary by the commission. Audit results shall be reported to the commission and to the Governor;

Employ, in accordance with KRS

45A.690

to

45A.725

, a qualified actuary to perform an actuarial study annually for the first three (3) years of the operations of the fund. Thereafter, the commission shall have actuarial studies performed every two (2) years or more frequently as determined necessary by the commission. Results of these studies shall be reported to the commission and to the Governor;

Perform all functions necessary and authorize expenditures from the fund necessary to carry out the provisions of law and the administrative regulations of the commission;

Report to the Governor and the Interim Joint Committee on Natural Resources and Environment no later than December 31 of each year as to the financial status of the reclamation guaranty fund;

Conduct investigations and issue subpoenas on behalf of the commission to verify reporting, payment, and other activities of permittees related to the fund. All documents produced in response to investigations and subpoenas by the commission shall remain confidential and not subject to the provisions of KRS

61.870

to

61.882

; and

Bring an action in Franklin Circuit Court against any permittee for the recovery of funds spent by the commission by reason of forfeiture of that permittee. The commission may utilize the legal department of the cabinet for this purpose.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 78, § 4, effective March 22, 2013.

350.512.
Office of the Reclamation Guaranty Fund — Duties of executive director.

The Governor shall establish an Office of the Reclamation Guaranty Fund and appoint an executive director to manage its affairs. The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor and have all the authority to hire staff, contract for necessary services, and implement the collection of fees and assessments set forth by the commission.

The executive director shall be responsible for:

Collecting and depositing into the fund all fees submitted by permittees;

Assessing permit eligibility of permittees for late payment or nonpayment of fees, in accordance with KRS

350.515

and

350.518

;

Compiling information about permittees for use by the commission in assigning or revising classifications and fees;

Paying moneys out of the fund as authorized by the commission;

At each meeting of the commission, reporting to the same, the status of the fund and activities of the fund’s executive director; and

Performing other administrative functions as are necessary to carry out the purposes of KRS

350.500

to

350.521

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 78, § 5, effective March 22, 2013.

350.515.
Mandatory participation in fund — Initial capitalization — One-time assessments — Full-cost bond in lieu of participation.

Any permittee of a surface coal mining operation, as defined in KRS 350.010(1), located in Kentucky who meets the criteria set forth in this section and in administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet, shall be a mandatory participant in the fund, except as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

The initial capitalization of the fund shall be accomplished in the following manner:

Transfer of the assets and liabilities of the voluntary bond pool fund to the Kentucky reclamation guaranty fund upon March 22, 2013; and

On the date of the establishment of the fund, each entity holding a permit subject to subsection (1) of this section shall be liable to the fund for the following one (1) time assessments, which shall be payable to the fund within thirty (30) days’ notice of the amounts thereof:

A start-up assessment of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500); and

An assessment of ten dollars ($10) per active permitted acre.

Members of the former voluntary bond pool as established prior to March 22, 2013, shall be exempt from the requirements of subsections (2)(b) and (4) of this section.

Entities entering the fund after the date of the establishment of the fund shall pay a one (1) time assessment of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) to the fund. The cabinet shall not issue a permit to the entity until the one (1) time assessment is paid.

Member entities shall be given the option to provide full-cost bonds based on a reclamation cost estimate that reflects reclamation costs to the cabinet and certified by a registered professional engineer in lieu of participation in the fund. The estimate’s calculations shall be equivalent to those set forth in the United States Office of Surface Mining Reclamation and Enforcement’s Handbook for the Calculation of Reclamation Bond Amounts, OSM Directive TSR-1, and calculated on forms developed by the cabinet. If an applicant opts out and elects to provide a full-cost bond, the applicant shall not be subject to any fees or to any provisions of KRS

350.500

to

350.521

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 78, § 6, effective March 22, 2013.

350.518.
Permittee to submit permit-specific bond under KRS 350.060(11) — Tonnage fees — Assignment of mine type classification — Inclusion of future permits of existing classification — Inclusion of future permits of existing voluntary bond pool fund members — Permit-specific penal bond — Administrative regulations — Suspension of permit for arrearage in fees — Rights and remedies.

In addition to the provisions of KRS

350.500

to

350.521

, each permittee shall submit a permit-specific bond in accordance with KRS 350.060(11) and all administrative regulations promulgated thereunder.

Each permittee subject to KRS

350.515

(1) shall pay to the fund a fee for each ton of coal mined and sold by surface and underground coal mining operations from each permit area. For the purposes of assessing tonnage fees, all permits subject to eligibility for expenditures from the fund shall be assigned to one (1) of the following classifications:

Surface coal mining operations, including auger and highwall mining, for which an initial rate of seven and fifty-seven hundredths cents ($0.0757) per ton of coal shall be paid to the fund;

Underground coal mining operations, for which an initial rate of three and fifty-seven hundredths cents ($0.0357) per ton of coal shall be paid to the fund;

Permits that consist of combined surface and underground mining operations shall pay a fee in accordance with the predominant method of coal extraction;

All permits previously subject to the voluntary bond pool fund at the time of its repeal by 2013 Ky. Acts ch. 78, sec. 12, shall:

Be excluded from the start-up fee established in KRS

350.515

;

Pay the tonnage fees set forth in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection to the fund in lieu of tonnage fees otherwise due under KRS 350.725(2); and

Continue to receive subsidization of the reclamation bonding authorized under KRS

350.500

to

350.521

and the administrative regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

The fund shall continue to provide coverage for existing bonds previously issued for them by the voluntary bond pool;

Permits which are used exclusively for coal preparation and processing operations, loading activities, disposal of refuse operations, coal haulage and access roads, mine maintenance areas, and other support facilities, and other permits not subject to the provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection as determined by the commission, shall pay an annual fee of ten dollars ($10) per acre to the fund in equal quarterly installments; and

Any permits, or expired permits, not subject to the fees in paragraphs (a) to (e) of this subsection shall pay an annual fee of six dollars ($6) per surface acre to the fund in equal quarterly installments. The fee shall not apply to permits that:

Have not been initially disturbed after permit issuance by the permittees;

Contain underground acreage only; or

Have received an initial bond release in accordance with KRS 350.093(4)(a).

The commission shall include in the fund under the terms set forth in subsection (2)(d) of this section, future permits obtained by entities that are members of the voluntary bond pool fund at the date of the establishment of the fund, provided the entity and the entity’s owners seeking permit coverage have:

Never committed a violation for mining without having first obtained the required permit under this chapter;

Never forfeited a bond or had a permit revoked under this chapter;

Never avoided forfeiture of a bond under this chapter because of a surety-performed reclamation work to avoid forfeiture;

Never been determined to have demonstrated a pattern of violations pursuant to KRS 350.028(4), 350.130(3), or 350.465(3)(f);

Not been issued more than four (4) orders for cessation and immediate compliance pursuant to a failure to perform remediation within the time or under the terms specified by the cabinet in a notice of noncompliance and order for remedial measures in the most recent thirty-six (36) months of operation and the order was abated as ordered by the cabinet in a timely manner and was not for a violation of contemporaneous reclamation requirements as prescribed in administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet and have reached final dispositions;

Not committed more than three (3) violations for contemporaneous reclamation requirements as prescribed in administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet in the most recent thirty-six (36) months of operation and the order was abated as ordered by the cabinet in a timely manner and have reached final disposition, except the commission may for good cause shown and by unanimous vote exclude violations that have been terminated by the cabinet with no civil penalty;

Not committed more than eight (8) violations of surface mining permanent program requirements set forth in this chapter or any performance standards for mining established in administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet pursuant to this chapter and which have reached final disposition on any one (1) permit in any twelve (12) month period of the most recent thirty-six (36) months of operation, except the commission may for good cause shown and by unanimous vote exclude the twelve (12) month period on one (1) permit during which the largest number of violations occurred and may for good cause shown and by unanimous vote exclude violations that were timely abated and terminated by the cabinet with no civil penalty; or

Not had civil penalties under this chapter or imposed pursuant to administrative hearing of the cabinet remaining unpaid more than thirty (30) days after they were due and payable, within the most recent thirty- six (36) months of operation.

The existing members of the voluntary bond pool are deemed to qualify as members thereof under the provisions of this subsection, and the provisions of this subsection shall only apply to the existing members of the voluntary bond pool prospectively from March 22, 2013.

The increase in the total amount of bonds issued to any one (1) member of the voluntary bond pool under subsection (3) of this section shall not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the greater of:

The member’s aggregate amount of bonds in force and issued by the voluntary bond pool as of March 22, 2013; or

The total of that member’s aggregate amount of bonds in force and issued by the voluntary bond pool as of March 22, 2013, plus fifty-five percent (55%) of that total.

The commission may consider for inclusion in the fund under the terms set forth in subsection (2)(d) of this section permits obtained by an entity which is not a participant of the fund as of March 22, 2013, provided the entity and the entity’s owners can meet eligibility standards established in administrative regulations promulgated by the commission.

Any permits accepted into the fund under the terms set forth in subsection (3) of this section shall require payment of a permit-specific penal bond computed at a rate of two thousand dollars ($2,000) for each acre or fraction of an acre included in the proposed permit area, and shall pay the actuarially determined tonnage rates set forth in subsection (2)(a) to (c) of this section.

Changes to the rates set forth in this section and others, including those set out in subsection (2)(d) of this section, shall be made by the commission through administrative regulation and shall be in an amount sufficient to maintain actuarial soundness of the fund in accordance with the annual actuarial study.

Reporting and payment of fees shall be made in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the commission. The commission may request and review documents and reports from the Kentucky Department for Natural Resources and the United States Office of Surface Mining Reclamation and Enforcement to verify production records submitted by permittees.

Upon the receipt of notification from the commission that a permittee is in arrearage in the payment of any fees assessed to a permit, the cabinet shall forthwith suspend the permit. A suspension of a permit under this subsection may be appealed pursuant to the hearing provisions of KRS

350.0301

.

A permit suspended by the cabinet under subsection (9) of this section shall have that suspension immediately lifted upon notification by the commission that the arrearage has been paid in full by the permittee.

Any person who considers himself or herself to be aggrieved by any determination made by the commission under KRS

350.500

to

350.521

shall have all of the rights and remedies provided in KRS

350.0301

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 78, § 7, effective March 22, 2013; 2018 ch. 85, § 7, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(3/22/2013). Under the authority of KRS 7.136(1), the Reviser of Statutes has modified the internal numbering of subsection (2)(d) of this statute from the way it appeared in 2013 Ky. Acts ch. 78, sec. 7. The words in the text were not changed.

350.521.
Forfeiture of bonds for permits covered by fund — Use of additional moneys when bond insufficient to cover estimated reclamation cost.

Bonds for permits covered by the fund forfeited after January 1, 2014, in accordance with KRS 350.130(1) shall be placed in the fund. The commission, its members, and employees shall not be named a party to any forfeiture action.

Whenever the bond for a permit covered by the fund is forfeited to the cabinet, and a cost estimate prepared by the cabinet indicates the forfeited bond is insufficient to reclaim the permit to the requirements of this chapter, the cabinet shall first use any outstanding permit-specific performance bond for reclamation on the forfeited permit. Any additional moneys necessary to reclaim the permit area to the standards of this chapter shall be withdrawn from the reclamation guaranty fund upon request by the cabinet to the extent that moneys exist in the fund.

Within seven (7) days following receipt of a request for payment of funds by the cabinet, the executive director of the fund shall pay to the cabinet the sum requested, not to exceed the estimated reclamation cost, subject to the limitations set forth in subsection (2) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 78, § 8, effective March 22, 2013.